Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1765HV (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. 1034 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 422.10C Firearm safety device tax 1 credit. 2 1. The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the credits 3 allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a firearm 4 safety device tax credit equal to the sales price of a firearm 5 safety device purchased during the tax year by the taxpayer, 6 not to exceed five hundred dollars. 7 2. For purposes of this section: 8 a. âFirearm safety deviceâ means a device designed 9 to prevent a firearm from being operated without first 10 deactivating the device or a qualified gun safe. 11 b. âQualified gun safeâ means a safe specifically 12 manufactured to store firearms and constructed of steel or a 13 material of equal or greater strength, which safe is purchased 14 new by the taxpayer from a firearms dealer licensed under 15 federal law, or a retailer as defined in section 423.1, and 16 which safe is purchased for the personal, noncommercial use of 17 the taxpayer. 18 c. âSales priceâ means the same as defined in section 423.1. 19 3. Any credit in excess of the taxpayerâs tax liability for 20 the tax year is not refundable but may be credited to the tax 21 liability for the following year. 22 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to firearm safety 23 devices purchased on or after the effective date of this Act. 24 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 25 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 26 or after that date. 27